Louisiana, session 2026, SB9.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. The introductory paragraph of R.S. 11:2174(B)(1)(b) is hereby amended
and reenacted to read as follows:
§2174. Remittance of percentage of taxes collected to fund; membership; salary
deductions; deficiency in fund; credit
* * *
B. Membership. (1)(a)
* * *
(b) Each deputy, including the criminal and civil deputies of the parish of
Orleans, and the criers of the several divisions of the Civil District Court for the
parish of Orleans or supreme court who, on the date of the filing of the application
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-181 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 9
to become a member, is age eighteen or over shall become a member of this fund,
that provided his monthly salary including state supplemental pay is not less than the
following:
* * *
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on June 30, 2026; if vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or June 30, 2026, whichever is later.